Illinois, session 104th, HB3838.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Ticket Sale and Resale Act is amended by 5changing Section 1.5 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 414/1.5)  (was 720 ILCS 375/1.5)7    Sec. 1.5. Sale of tickets at more than face value 8prohibited; exceptions. 9    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b), (c), 10(d), (e), and (f-5) of this Section and in Section 4, it is 11unlawful for any person, persons, firm or corporation to sell 12tickets for baseball games, football games, hockey games, 13theatre entertainments, or any other amusement for a price 14more than the price printed upon the face of said ticket, and 15the price of said ticket shall correspond with the same price 16shown at the box office or the office of original 17distribution.18    (b) This Act does not apply to the resale of tickets of 19admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 20or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a 21price in excess of the printed box office ticket price by a 22ticket broker who meets all of the following requirements:23        (1) The ticket broker is duly registered with the   HB3838- 2 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1    Office of the Secretary of State on a registration form 2    provided by that Office. The registration must contain a 3    certification that the ticket broker:4            (A) engages in the resale of tickets on a regular 5        and ongoing basis from one or more permanent or fixed 6        locations located within this State;7            (B) maintains as the principal business activity 8        at those locations the resale of tickets;9            (C) displays at those locations the ticket 10        broker's registration;11            (D) maintains at those locations a listing of the 12        names and addresses of all persons employed by the 13        ticket broker;14            (E) is in compliance with all applicable federal, 15        State, and local laws relating to its ticket selling 16        activities, and that neither the ticket broker nor any 17        of its employees within the preceding 12 months have 18        been convicted of a violation of this Act; and19            (F) meets the following requirements:20                (i) the ticket broker maintains a toll free 21            number specifically dedicated for Illinois 22            consumer complaints and inquiries concerning 23            ticket sales;24                (ii) the ticket broker has adopted a code that 25            advocates consumer protection that includes, at a 26            minimum:  HB3838- 3 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1                    (a-1) consumer protection guidelines;2                    (b-1) a standard refund policy. In the 3                event a refund is due, the ticket broker shall 4                provide that refund without charge other than 5                for reasonable delivery fees for the return of 6                the tickets; and7                    (c-1) standards of professional conduct;8                (iii) the ticket broker has adopted a 9            procedure for the binding resolution of consumer 10            complaints by an independent, disinterested third 11            party and thereby submits to the jurisdiction of 12            the State of Illinois; and13                (iv) the ticket broker has established and 14            maintains a consumer protection rebate fund in 15            Illinois in an amount in excess of $100,000, which 16            must be cash available for immediate disbursement 17            for satisfaction of valid consumer complaints.18        Alternatively, the ticket broker may fulfill the 19    requirements of subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (1) if 20    the ticket broker certifies that he or she belongs to a 21    professional association organized under the laws of this 22    State, or organized under the laws of any other state and 23    authorized to conduct business in Illinois, that has been 24    in existence for at least 3 years prior to the date of that 25    broker's registration with the Office of the Secretary of 26    State, and is specifically dedicated, for and on behalf of   HB3838- 4 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1    its members, to provide and maintain the consumer 2    protection requirements of subparagraph (F) of this 3    paragraph (1) to maintain the integrity of the ticket 4    brokerage industry.5        (2) (Blank).6        (3) The ticket broker and his employees must not 7    engage in the practice of selling, or attempting to sell, 8    tickets for any event while sitting or standing near the 9    facility at which the event is to be held or is being held 10    unless the ticket broker or his or her employees are on 11    property they own, lease, or have permission to occupy.12        (4) The ticket broker must comply with all 13    requirements of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and 14    collect and remit all other applicable federal, State and 15    local taxes in connection with the ticket broker's ticket 16    selling activities.17        (5) Beginning January 1, 1996, no ticket broker shall 18    advertise for resale any tickets within this State unless 19    the advertisement contains the name of the ticket broker 20    and the Illinois registration number issued by the Office 21    of the Secretary of State under this Section.22        (6) Each ticket broker registered under this Act shall 23    pay an annual registration fee of $100.24    (c) This Act does not apply to the sale of tickets of 25admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 26or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a   HB3838- 5 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1price in excess of the printed box office ticket price by a 2reseller engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce on an 3Internet auction listing service duly registered with the 4Office of the Secretary of State on a registration form 5provided by that Office. This subsection (c) applies to both 6sales through an online bid submission process and sales at a 7fixed price on the same website or interactive computer 8service as an Internet auction listing service.9    This subsection (c) applies to resales described in this 10subsection only if the operator of the Internet auction 11listing service meets the following requirements:12        (1) the operator maintains a listing of the names and 13    addresses of its corporate officers;14        (2) the operator is in compliance with all applicable 15    federal, State, and local laws relating to ticket selling 16    activities, and the operator's officers and directors have 17    not been convicted of a violation of this Act within the 18    preceding 12 months; 19        (3) the operator maintains, either itself or through 20    an affiliate, a toll free number dedicated for consumer 21    complaints;22        (4) the operator provides consumer protections that 23    include at a minimum:24            (A) consumer protection guidelines;25            (B) a standard refund policy that guarantees to 26        all purchasers that it will provide and in fact   HB3838- 6 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1        provides a full refund of the amount paid by the 2        purchaser (including, but not limited to, all fees, 3        regardless of how characterized) if the following 4        occurs:5                (i) the ticketed event is cancelled and the 6            purchaser returns the tickets to the seller or 7            Internet auction listing service; however, 8            reasonable delivery fees need not be refunded if 9            the previously disclosed guarantee specifies that 10            the fees will not be refunded if the event is 11            cancelled;12                (ii) the ticket received by the purchaser does 13            not allow the purchaser to enter the ticketed 14            event for reasons that may include, without 15            limitation, that the ticket is counterfeit or that 16            the ticket has been cancelled by the issuer due to 17            non-payment, unless the ticket is cancelled due to 18            an act or omission by such purchaser;19                (iii) the ticket fails to conform to its 20            description on the Internet auction listing 21            service; or22                (iv) the ticket seller willfully fails to send 23            the ticket or tickets to the purchaser, or the 24            ticket seller attempted to deliver the ticket or 25            tickets to the purchaser in the manner required by 26            the Internet auction listing service and the   HB3838- 7 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1            purchaser failed to receive the ticket or tickets; 2            and 3            (C) standards of professional conduct; 4        (5) the operator has adopted an independent and 5    disinterested dispute resolution procedure that allows 6    resellers or purchasers to file complaints against the 7    other and have those complaints mediated or resolved by a 8    third party, and requires the resellers or purchasers to 9    submit to the jurisdiction of the State of Illinois for 10    complaints involving a ticketed event held in Illinois;11        (6) the operator either:12            (A) complies with all applicable requirements of 13        the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and collects and 14        remits all applicable federal, State, and local taxes; 15        or 16            (B) publishes a written notice on the website 17        after the sale of one or more tickets that 18        automatically informs the ticket reseller of the 19        ticket reseller's potential legal obligation to pay 20        any applicable local amusement tax in connection with 21        the reseller's sale of tickets, and discloses to law 22        enforcement or other government tax officials, without 23        subpoena, the name, city, state, telephone number, 24        e-mail address, user ID history, fraud complaints, and 25        bidding and listing history of any specifically 26        identified reseller or purchaser upon the receipt of a   HB3838- 8 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1        verified request from law enforcement or other 2        government tax officials relating to a criminal 3        investigation or alleged illegal activity; and 4        (7) the operator either:5            (A) has established and maintains a consumer 6        protection rebate fund in Illinois in an amount in 7        excess of $100,000, which must be cash available for 8        immediate disbursement for satisfaction of valid 9        consumer complaints; or10            (B) has obtained and maintains in force an errors 11        and omissions insurance policy that provides at least 12        $100,000 in coverage. 13    (d) This Act does not apply to the resale of tickets of 14admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 15or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a 16price in excess of the printed box office ticket price 17conducted at an auction solely by or for a not-for-profit 18organization for charitable purposes under clause (a)(1) of 19Section 10-1 of the Auction License Act.20    (e) This Act does not apply to the resale of a ticket for 21admission to a baseball game, football game, hockey game, 22theatre entertainment, or any other amusement for a price more 23than the price printed on the face of the ticket and for more 24than the price of the ticket at the box office if the resale is 25made through an Internet website whose operator meets the 26following requirements:  HB3838- 9 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1        (1) the operator has a business presence and physical 2    street address in the State of Illinois and clearly and 3    conspicuously posts that address on the website;4        (2) the operator maintains a listing of the names of 5    the operator's directors and officers, and is duly 6    registered with the Office of the Secretary of State on a 7    registration form provided by that Office; 8        (3) the operator is in compliance with all applicable 9    federal, State, and local laws relating to its ticket 10    reselling activities regulated under this Act, and the 11    operator's officers and directors have not been convicted 12    of a violation of this Act within the preceding 12 months; 13        (4) the operator maintains a toll free number 14    specifically dedicated for consumer complaints and 15    inquiries regarding ticket resales made through the 16    website;17        (5) the operator either:18            (A) has established and maintains a consumer 19        protection rebate fund in Illinois in an amount in 20        excess of $100,000, which must be cash available for 21        immediate disbursement for satisfaction of valid 22        consumer complaints; or23            (B) has obtained and maintains in force an errors 24        and omissions policy of insurance in the minimum 25        amount of $100,000 for the satisfaction of valid 26        consumer complaints;  HB3838- 10 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1        (6) the operator has adopted an independent and 2    disinterested dispute resolution procedure that allows 3    resellers or purchasers to file complaints against the 4    other and have those complaints mediated or resolved by a 5    third party, and requires the resellers or purchasers to 6    submit to the jurisdiction of the State of Illinois for 7    complaints involving a ticketed event held in Illinois;8        (7) the operator either:9            (A) complies with all applicable requirements of 10        the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and collects and 11        remits all applicable federal, State, and local taxes; 12        or13            (B) publishes a written notice on the website 14        after the sale of one or more tickets that 15        automatically informs the ticket reseller of the 16        ticket reseller's potential legal obligation to pay 17        any applicable local amusement tax in connection with 18        the reseller's sale of tickets, and discloses to law 19        enforcement or other government tax officials, without 20        subpoena, the name, city, state, telephone number, 21        e-mail address, user ID history, fraud complaints, and 22        bidding and listing history of any specifically 23        identified reseller or purchaser upon the receipt of a 24        verified request from law enforcement or other 25        government tax officials relating to a criminal 26        investigation or alleged illegal activity; and   HB3838- 11 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1        (8) the operator guarantees to all purchasers that it 2    will provide and in fact provides a full refund of the 3    amount paid by the purchaser (including, but not limited 4    to, all fees, regardless of how characterized) if any of 5    the following occurs:6            (A) the ticketed event is cancelled and the 7        purchaser returns the tickets to the website operator; 8        however, reasonable delivery fees need not be refunded 9        if the previously disclosed guarantee specifies that 10        the fees will not be refunded if the event is 11        cancelled;12            (B) the ticket received by the purchaser does not 13        allow the purchaser to enter the ticketed event for 14        reasons that may include, without limitation, that the 15        ticket is counterfeit or that the ticket has been 16        cancelled by the issuer due to non-payment, unless the 17        ticket is cancelled due to an act or omission by the 18        purchaser;19            (C) the ticket fails to conform to its description 20        on the website; or21            (D) the ticket seller willfully fails to send the 22        ticket or tickets to the purchaser, or the ticket 23        seller attempted to deliver the ticket or tickets to 24        the purchaser in the manner required by the website 25        operator and the purchaser failed to receive the 26        ticket or tickets.   HB3838- 12 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1    Nothing in this subsection (e) shall be deemed to imply 2any limitation on ticket sales made in accordance with 3subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Section or any 4limitation on sales made in accordance with Section 4. 5    (f) The provisions of subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e) 6of this Section apply only to the resale of a ticket after the 7initial sale of that ticket. No reseller of a ticket may refuse 8to sell tickets to another ticket reseller solely on the basis 9that the purchaser is a ticket reseller or ticket broker 10authorized to resell tickets pursuant to this Act. 11    (f-5) In addition to the requirements imposed under 12subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this Section, 13ticket brokers and resellers must comply with the requirements 14of this subsection. Before accepting any payment from a 15purchaser, a ticket broker or reseller must disclose to the 16purchaser in a clear, conspicuous, and readily noticeable 17manner the following information: 18        (1) the registered name and city of the event venue;19        (2) that the ticket broker or reseller is not the 20    event venue box office or its licensed ticket agent, but 21    is, instead, a ticket broker or reseller and that lost or 22    stolen tickets may be reissued only by ticket brokers or 23    resellers;24        (3) whether it is registered under this Act; and25        (4) its refund policy, name, and contact information. 26    Before selling and accepting payment for a ticket, a   HB3838- 13 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1ticket broker or reseller must require the purchaser to 2acknowledge by an affirmative act the disclosures required 3under this subsection. The disclosures required by this 4subsection must be made in a clear and conspicuous manner, 5appear together, and be preceded by the heading "IMPORTANT 6NOTICE" which must be in bold face font that is larger than the 7font size of the required disclosures.8    Ticket brokers and resellers must guarantee a full refund 9of the amount paid by the purchaser, including handling and 10delivery fees, if any of the following occurs:11        (1) the ticket received by the purchaser does not 12    grant the purchaser admission to the event described on 13    the ticket, unless it is due to an act or omission by the 14    purchaser;15        (2) the ticket fails to conform substantially to its 16    description as advertised; or17        (3) the event for which the ticket has been resold is 18    cancelled and not rescheduled. 19    This subsection (f-5) does not apply to an Internet 20auction listing service.21    (f-10) A ticket seller, ticket reseller, and ticket broker 22shall display the full price of a ticket, including all 23assessed fees, to a purchaser when the price of a ticket is 24first shown to the purchaser and shall not increase that price 25during the transaction with the purchaser. The use of dynamic 26pricing in the course of selling a ticket is a violation of   HB3838- 14 -LRB104 10240 SPS 20314 b1this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "dynamic 2pricing" means the practice of adjusting prices in real time 3based on demand, consumer data, or other factors including, 4but not limited to, artificial intelligence-enabled pricing 5adjustments.6    (g) The provisions of Public Act 89-406 are severable 7under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.8    (h) The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 94th 9General Assembly are severable under Section 1.31 of the 10Statute on Statutes. 11(Source: P.A. 99-431, eff. 1-1-16; 100-534, eff. 9-22-17.)